Utah statutes.
53-2a-808.   Formalities of taking office.

(1)  At the time that they are appointed as emergency interim successors or special emergency judges, emergency interim successors and special emergency judges shall sign prospectively whatever oath is required to enable them to exercise the powers and duties of the office to which they may succeed.

(2)  Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no person is required to comply with any other provision of law relative to taking office as a prerequisite to the exercise of the powers or discharge of the duties of an office to which the person succeeds.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 295, 2013 General Session

